Maryland, session 2026, HB0155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0155*

HOUSE BILL 155
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission.
3–207.
(P) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “FACE COVERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–535 OF
THIS TITLE.
(III) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL POLICY
PROHIBITING THE USE OF A FACE COVERING BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN
THE COURSE OF DUTY CONSISTENT WITH § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE LANGUAGE AFFIRMING:
1. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S COMMITMENT TO
TRANSPARENCY, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND PUBLIC TRUST;
2. THAT THE AUTHORIZED USE OF FACE COVERINGS
SHALL BE LIMITED TO SPECIFIC AND CLEARLY DEFINED CIRCUMSTANCES; AND
3. THAT GENERALIZED AND UNDIFFERENTIATED FEAR
AND APPREHENSION ABOUT LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SAFETY IS NOT
SUFFICIENT TO JUSTIFY THE USE OF FACE COVERINGS.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS OPERATING IN THE STATE SHALL ADOPT A POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THE
MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 155 3
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “FACE COVERING” MEANS ANY OPAQUE MASK, GARMENT,
HELMET, HEADGEAR, OR OTHER ITEM THAT CONCEALS OR OBSCURES THE FACE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL.
(II) “FACE COVERING” INCLUDES A BALACLAVA, SKI MASK,
NECK GAITER, OR TACTICAL MASK.
(III) “FACE COVERING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A TRANSLUCENT FACE SHIELD OR CLEAR MASK THAT
DOES NOT CONCEAL THE WEARER’S FACE;
2. A MEDICAL–GRADE OR SURGICAL MASK WORN TO
PROTECT AGAINST THE TRANSMISSION OF DISEASE OR INFECTION;
3. A MASK OR AN APPARATUS, SUCH AS A
SELF–CONTAINED BREATHING APPARATUS, NECESSARY TO PROTECT AGAINST
EXPOSURE TO ANY TOXINS, GAS, SMOKE, OR OTHER HAZARDOUS OR HARMFUL
ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITION;
4. A MASK, HELMET, SELF–CONTAINED BREATHING
APPARATUS, OR OTHER DEVICE NECESSARY FOR UNDERWATER USE;
5. A MOTORCYCLE HELMET WHEN WORN BY AN
INDIVIDUAL UTILIZING A MOTORCYCLE OR OTHER VEHICLE THAT REQUIRES A
HELMET FOR SAFE OPERATIONS;
6. EYEWEAR NECESSARY TO PROTECT AN INDIVIDUAL
FROM THE USE OF RETINAL WEAPONS AND LASERS;
7. A GARMENT WORN FOR RELIGIOUS PURPOSES;
8. PROTECTIVE GEAR WORN DURING TACTICAL
OPERATIONS FOR PURPOSES OF PHYSICAL SAFETY; OR
9. ANY OTHER ITEM WORN TO FOLLOW APPLICABLE
LAWS ON OCCUPATIONAL HEALTH AND SAFETY OR REASONABLE WORKPLACE
ACCOMMODATIONS.

HOUSE BILL 155
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” INCLUDES A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY OF:
(I) THE STATE;
(II) ANOTHER STATE;
(III) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE OR ANOTHER
STATE; OR
(IV) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(4) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS A SWORN MEMBER OF A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
ACTIVELY ENGAGED IN AN UNDERCOVER OPERATION.
(C) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT WEAR A FACE COVERING
WHILE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN THE STATE, EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED IN A
POLICY ADOPTED UNDER § 3–207(P)(3) OF THIS TITLE.
(D) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(I) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$2,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) WAIVES ALL IMMUNITY IN A CIVIL ACTION BASED ON THE
VIOLATION.
(2) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES POLICE
MISCONDUCT FOR PURPOSES OF SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.